Connecticut, session 2026, HB05310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-223 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal violation of a protective order when
an order issued pursuant to subsection (e) of section 46b-38c, subsection
(f) of section 53a-28, or section 54-1k or 54-82r has been issued against
such person, and such person violates such order.
(b) No person who is listed as a protected person in such protective
order may be criminally liable for (1) soliciting, requesting,
commanding, importuning or intentionally aiding in the violation of the
protective order pursuant to subsection (a) of section 53a-8, or (2)
conspiracy to violate such protective order pursuant to section 53a-48.
(c) Criminal violation of a protective order is a class D felony, except
that any violation of a protective order that involves (1) imposing any
LCO No. 1837 1 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5310
restraint upon the person or liberty of a person in violation of the
protective order, or (2) threatening, harassing, assaulting, molesting,
sexually assaulting or attacking a person in violation of the protective
order is a class C felony.
(d) In any prosecution for a criminal violation of a protective order
under this section, it shall be an affirmative defense that the protected
person, directly, indirectly or through a third person, initiated or
encouraged the contact or conduct prohibited pursuant to the order,
unless the defendant's resulting contact or conduct constitutes a
separate criminal offense.
Sec. 2. Section 53a-223a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal violation of a standing criminal
protective order when an order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 53a-40e has been issued against such person, and such person
violates such order.
(b) No person who is listed as a protected person in such standing
criminal protective order may be criminally liable for (1) soliciting,
requesting, commanding, importuning or intentionally aiding in the
violation of the standing criminal protective order pursuant to
subsection (a) of section 53a-8, or (2) conspiracy to violate such standing
criminal protective order pursuant to section 53a-48.
(c) Criminal violation of a standing criminal protective order is a class
D felony, except that any violation that involves (1) imposing any
restraint upon the person or liberty of a person in violation of the
standing criminal protective order, or (2) threatening, harassing,
assaulting, molesting, sexually assaulting or attacking a person in
violation of the standing criminal protective order is a class C felony.
(d) In any prosecution for a criminal violation of a standing criminal
protective order under this section, it shall be an affirmative defense that
LCO No. 1837 2 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5310
a protected person, directly, indirectly or through a third person,
initiated or encouraged the contact or conduct prohibited by the order,
unless the defendant's resulting contact or conduct constitutes a
separate criminal offense.
Sec. 3. Section 53a-223b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal violation of a restraining order when
(1) (A) a restraining order has been issued against such person pursuant
to section 46b-15, or (B) a foreign order of protection, as defined in
section 46b-15a, has been issued against such person in a case involving
the use, attempted use or threatened use of physical force against
another, and (2) such person, having knowledge of the terms of the
order, (A) does not stay away from a person or place in violation of the
order, (B) contacts a person in violation of the order, (C) imposes any
restraint upon the person or liberty of a person in violation of the order,
or (D) threatens, harasses, assaults, molests, sexually assaults or attacks
a person in violation of the order.
(b) No person who is listed as a protected person in such restraining
order or foreign order of protection may be criminally liable for (1)
soliciting, requesting, commanding, importuning or intentionally
aiding in the violation of the restraining order or foreign order of
protection pursuant to subsection (a) of section 53a-8, or (2) conspiracy
to violate such restraining order or foreign order of protection pursuant
to section 53a-48.
(c) No person who is listed as a respondent in a restraining order
issued pursuant to section 46b-15 or a foreign order of protection issued
pursuant to section 46b-15a and against whom there is an order of no
contact with the protected party or parties may be criminally liable for
a violation of such order if such person causes a document filed in a
family relations matter, as defined in section 46b-1, to be served on the
protected party or parties in accordance with the law by mail or through
LCO No. 1837 3 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5310
a third party who is authorized by statute to serve process.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
criminal violation of a restraining order is a class D felony.
(2) Criminal violation of a restraining order is a class C felony if the
offense is a violation of subparagraph (C) or (D) of subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section.
(e) In any prosecution for a criminal violation of a restraining order
under this section, it shall be an affirmative defense that a protected
person, directly, indirectly or through a third person, initiated or
encouraged the contact or conduct prohibited by the order, unless the
defendant's resulting contact or conduct constitutes a separate criminal
offense.
Sec. 4. Section 53a-223c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal violation of a civil protection order
when (1) a civil protection order has been issued against such person
pursuant to section 46b-16a, and (2) such person, having knowledge of
the terms of the order, violates such order.
(b) No person who is listed as a respondent in a civil protection order
issued pursuant to section 46b-16a may be criminally liable for a
violation of such order if such person causes a legal document to be
served on the protected person by mail or through a third party in
accordance with the law. For purposes of this subsection, "legal
document" includes, but is not limited to, a notice of appearance or any
other application, petition, or motion filed in good faith by such person
100 in connection with any pending court matter, or in any court matter that
101 may be brought subsequently.
102 (c) Criminal violation of a civil protection order is a class D felony.
103 (d) In any prosecution for a criminal violation of a civil protective
LCO No. 1837 4 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5310
104 order under this section, it shall be an affirmative defense that a
105 protected person, directly, indirectly or through a third person, initiated
106 or encouraged the contact or conduct prohibited by the order, unless the
107 defendant's resulting contact or conduct constitutes a separate criminal
108 offense.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-223
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 53a-223a
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 53a-223b
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 53a-223c